Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 63 Military Property
12-63-304. Renting of currently used readiness centers — Disposition of proceeds.

The Adjutant General, acting for and on behalf of the Arkansas National Guard, shall issue rules concerning the rental and use of a National Guard readiness center or its facilities or portions thereof to any person, organization, firm, corporation, or governmental agency for any legal use for short periods of time, provided the renting of the readiness center or its facilities or portions thereof does not interfere with its use by the National Guard for training or other military purposes.

All such rentals shall be in writing and shall contain appropriate clauses permitting immediate termination or cancellation of the rental agreement on order of the Adjutant General should the public interest or National Guard purposes necessitate the termination.

A readiness center or its facilities or portions thereof shall not be rented for less than an amount sufficient to cover all expenses, including custodian fees, utility bills, janitor service, and any repairs occasioned by such use.

Readiness center funds are those funds derived from the use of the facilities by an individual, agency, or organization other than the official users of the facilities by National Guard units quartered therein. Social meetings for members of a unit and their families, sponsored by the unit, are considered official.

A full and complete record of funds received and disbursed shall be maintained by the senior officer of the official using the unit and shall be subject to audit as may be required by the Adjutant General.

The Adjutant General shall publish rules governing the expenditure of such rental funds to ensure that the state expenses are recovered from the rental funds and that rental funds are used for Arkansas National Guard morale, welfare, and recreation events.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “readiness center” for “armory” or “armories” throughout; inserted “or its facilities or portions thereof” twice in (a); substituted “or its facilities or portions thereof” for “or facility” in (c); and substituted “to ensure that the state expenses are recovered from the rental funds and that rental funds are used for Arkansas National Guard morale, welfare, and recreation events” for “with a limitation of ten percent (10%) of the annual income limited to unit social purposes” in (d)(3).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a) and (d)(3).

The Adjutant General may sell, convey, or otherwise dispose of property under this section by deed, lease, license, permit, or other instrument executed by him or her on behalf of and in the name of the State of Arkansas.

The Adjutant General shall approve the price, consideration, and other terms and conditions related to the sale, conveyance, or other disposal of property under this section.

The Adjutant General may also enter into agreements with cities, counties, school boards, other political subdivisions of the state, or any other public entity, body, board, commission, agency, or governmental corporation to convey an estate in real property or other improvements formerly used for National Guard purposes to the political subdivision or public entity in the event the Adjutant General determines that the transfer would be in the better interest of the National Guard and the local community, subject to any reversionary interest that may exist with respect to the estate in favor of the State of Arkansas or of the United States.

Any conveyance under this section is subject to the approval of the Secretary of the Army or the Secretary of the Air Force, as the case may be, and in compliance with applicable regulations and instructions.

(1)When and if, in the judgment of the Adjutant General, the use of any parcel of real property or any armory, warehouse, or other improvements thereon located owned by or leased to the State of Arkansas for the use and benefit of the National Guard or any portion thereof is temporarily not required and not necessary for National Guard purposes, the Adjutant General shall have authority to lease or sublease any real property or portion thereof for such a rental and on such terms and conditions and for such a period of time as the Adjutant General shall deem to the best interest of the National Guard. The lease or sublease contract shall be executed by the Adjutant General for and in the name and behalf of the State of Arkansas.

(1)(A)Before the Adjutant General shall lease, rent, sell, convey, or otherwise dispose of any estate in any real property or improvement on the property other than a lease or rental for thirty (30) days or less for the use of real property, buildings, armories, airfields, or other improvements that are temporarily not required for military purposes, he or she shall publish a notice one (1) time in some newspaper published and having a general circulation in the state at least ten (10) days before the date on which the property is offered for conveyance or disposal.

The notice shall describe the estate or property and notify all interested persons that the estate or property will be conveyed or disposed of and of the conditions, terms, time, and place at which bids or requests for proposals shall be received for the estate or property.

Bids or proposals for the conveyance, disposal, purchase, lease, or other disposition of the estate in any real property substantially on the terms specified in the notice shall be received by the Adjutant General at the time and place specified in the notice in the form of open or sealed bids or requests for proposals, as the Adjutant General may direct.

Subject to the Adjutant General's right to reject all bids and proposals, the property shall be conveyed to the person, firm, or corporation submitting the bid or proposal which in the judgment of the Adjutant General, taking into consideration the amount to be paid and the terms and conditions of the conveyance, is most advantageous to the security and interests of the State of Arkansas and the United States.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2003, No. 1094, §§ 1 and 2 provided:

“SECTION 1.Purpose. The purpose of this act is to clarify that the Adjutant General of the State of Arkansas has the authority, acting in the best interests of the security and defense of the state and of the United States, to convey any estate in military real property of which the Adjutant General is custodian by any lawful method of conveyance upon the terms and conditions as he or she may deem appropriate and subject to the approval of the United States.

“SECTION 2.Findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)The Adjutant General of the State of Arkansas is the custodian of the military reservations and military property of the State of Arkansas;

“(2)The United States retains a reversionary estate in all of the military reservations, and furthermore the United States retains various regulatory interests in and to other military properties located within the State of Arkansas;

“(3)A conveyance of unneeded excess military real properties is subject to the consent of the United States acting by and through the Secretary of the Army or the Secretary of the Air Force;

“(4)The disposal of military real properties property is presently restricted by law to the disadvantage of the best interests of the people of the State of Arkansas;

“(5)The authority of the Adjutant General to convey estates in military real property is unreasonably restricted; and

“(6)The restrictions at law should be removed.”

Amendments. The 2003 amendment rewrote this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 716, § 18, provided:

“CAMP ROBINSON — VARIOUS STATE MILITARY LAKES. The State Military Department is hereby authorized to stock various State Military Lakes on Camp Robinson post each year with fish for special events by using wildlife funds and rental income, no State General Revenue will be used.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 196, § 18, provided:

“CAMP ROBINSON — VARIOUS STATE MILITARY LAKES. The State Military Department is hereby authorized to stock various State Military Lakes on Camp Robinson post each year with fish for special events by using wildlife funds and rental income, no State General Revenue will be used.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Preambles. Acts 1951, No. 121 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, An efficient national guard is an integral part of the defense of this state and of the United States, and

“Whereas, Camp Joseph T. Robinson is necessary for training grounds for said National Guard, and

“Whereas, the United States Government, acting by and through the Secretary of Army, under authority of an Act of Congress, approved June 30, 1950, styled and cited as Public Law No. 593, 81st Congress, Second Session, did grant, transfer and convey to the State of Arkansas, all rights, title and interest of the United States of America in and to substantially all of the real property comprising Camp Joseph T. Robinson by deed, said deed being of record in the County of Pulaski, Book Volume No. 447, page 343, and in the County of Faulkner, Book Volume No. 119, page 571, together with the buildings and improvements thereon, and all appurtenances and utilities belonging or appertaining thereto including a water pipe line to Camp Joseph T. Robinson, said property to be used primarily for training the National Guard, and for other military purposes;

“Now, therefore….”

Acts 1955, No. 381 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the State of Arkansas accepted title to Camp Joseph T. Robinson from the federal government for the training of the Arkansas National Guard and for other military purposes, as provided by Act 121 of 1951, and

“Whereas, certain tracts of said Camp Joseph T. Robinson, including area generally known as the Hospital Area, were not originally included in the deed described in said Act 121; and

“Whereas, title to said tracts has now revested in the United States and it is anticipated that Federal legislation will be introduced authorizing a transfer of title to the property to the State of Arkansas without cost and subject to the same restrictions as that portion transferred under provisions of said Act 121;

“Now, therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1951, No. 121, § 3: Feb. 20, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “In view of the international situation, it is of the utmost importance to the safety of the people of the State of Arkansas and of the United States, that title to Camp Joseph T. Robinson be accepted by the State of Arkansas, and that the rental, leases, and sales from said camp be in turn reinvested in the maintenance and upkeep of said camp to the end that the National Guard shall have adequate facilities for proper training. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall have effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1955, No. 381, § 3: Mar. 24, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “In view of the fact that immediate legal control and supervision of all portions of Camp Joseph T. Robinson are of utmost importance in preservation and security of government property located therein, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall have effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 489, § 9: Mar. 18, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the General Assembly that Camp Joseph T. Robinson, a former United States Military Reservation, now operated by the State of Arkansas, is necessary for the training and maintaining of an efficient Arkansas National Guard as an integral part of the defense of this state and of the United States and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to increase and maintain the morale and efficiency of the entire National Guard. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and welfare, shall be in effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 137, § 4: Feb. 10, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Department of Defense technicians and full-time employees of the Arkansas Military Department and other persons designated by the governing board of the military canteen at Camp Joseph T. Robinson should have the privilege of purchasing at the Camp Robinson Canteen; that present law does not provide such privilege, and this act is immediately necessary to cure such inequity. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 781, § 3: Apr. 7, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is some question concerning the right of dependents of military personnel, Department of Defense technicians and employees of the Arkansas Military Department to make purchases at the military canteen at Camp Joseph T. Robinson; that this Act is designed to assure that such dependents who hold proper identification cards will be permitted to make such purchases and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 732, § 11: Mar. 25, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that conflicting regulations are causing unnecessary expense in the operation of the Camp Joseph T. Robinson Canteen. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 924, § 5: Apr. 7, 1993, and No. 1034, § 5: Apr. 12, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Camp Joseph T. Robinson operated by the State of Arkansas is necessary for the training and maintaining of an efficient Arkansas National Guard and this act is necessary to increase and maintain the morale and efficiency of the Arkansas National Guard. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

(1)The purchase price, rental, or other moneys to be paid for the conveyance of the estate or property for a period of more than thirty (30) days under the terms, conditions, and consideration of the conveyance shall be deposited into the State Treasury.

The State of Arkansas accepts title to the property, improvements, and appurtenances situated at Camp Joseph T. Robinson.

The State of Arkansas authorizes the Adjutant General to accept title to, enter into leases, licenses, and operating agreements for, or otherwise acquire on behalf of the State of Arkansas real property, improvements, and appurtenances from the United States upon such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed between the United States Government and the Adjutant General acting in behalf of the State of Arkansas.

The State of Arkansas authorizes the Adjutant General to accept title to, enter into leases, licenses, and operating agreements for, or otherwise acquire on behalf of the State of Arkansas real property, improvements, and appurtenances adjoining or as an adjunct to Camp Joseph T. Robinson or adjoining or as an adjunct to other real property owned or held by the Adjutant General upon terms and conditions as may be agreed to between the Adjutant General, acting on behalf of the State of Arkansas, and the owner of such real property.

Interests in real property shall not be purchased or acquired by the Adjutant General except by gift or for a consideration of not greater than ten dollars ($10.00) except upon an appropriation by the General Assembly or with such funds provided from the United States authorized to be expended for such purposes.

The Adjutant General is authorized to establish and operate upon such lands military training and support facilities, canteens, morale, welfare, and recreational facilities, service clubs, and other facilities as may be necessary and proper for military purposes, or which are customary in the military services, and to conduct upon such lands such other activities and operate such facilities as may be ordered by the Governor or be required by law.

Such military training and support facilities, canteens, morale, welfare, and recreational facilities, service clubs, and other facilities as may be established and operated by the Adjutant General shall be operated in accordance with applicable regulations of the United States armed forces, subject to the orders, directions, regulations, and general supervision of the Adjutant General, and subject to such restrictions and requirements as provided by state law governing other military training facilities, recreational facilities, and service clubs operated by the Adjutant General.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Pollution Control and Ecology” in (c)(1) and in (c)(2)(B); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c)(1)(B) and (c)(2)(B).

To hire and set the salaries or compensation of sufficient employees for the operation of canteens and exchanges;

To enter into contracts or agreements with wholesalers, distributors, or suppliers of inventory items for stocking the canteens and exchanges;

To prescribe a system of bookkeeping, accounting, and auditing procedures for the proper handling of funds derived from the operations of canteens and exchanges; and

To prescribe rules governing the operation of the canteens and exchanges on military reservations and military properties.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(4).

Students attending training programs at Camp Joseph T. Robinson or Fort Chaffee;

Contractors and their employees performing work pursuant to a contract with the United States or the State of Arkansas on Camp Joseph T. Robinson or Fort Chaffee;

Employees of tenant government agencies located on Camp Joseph T. Robinson or Fort Chaffee; and

Dependents of the persons in subdivisions (b)(1)-(7) of this section who hold identification cards evidencing their status, as may be found acceptable to the Adjutant General.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of the Military” for “State Military Department” in (b)(4).

Cross References. Sales of alcoholic beverages under the post exchange package permit, §3-4-703.

Active, retired, and reserve members of the armed services;

Full-time employees of the Department of the Military and the United States Department of Defense;

Employees of contractors performing contracts or services on either Camp Joseph T. Robinson or Fort Chaffee; or

Employees of other government agencies, students, and other tenants of either Camp Joseph T. Robinson or Fort Chaffee.

(1)The Adjutant General shall cause an external annual audit of the Camp Joseph T. Robinson and Fort Chaffee canteens.

The Adjutant General shall, within ten (10) days of receipt, submit a copy of the annual audits and any other audits of the Camp Joseph T. Robinson and Fort Chaffee canteens conducted in accordance with regulations of the United States Department of the Army, the United States Department of the Air Force, and the National Guard Bureau to Arkansas Legislative Audit.

Publisher's Notes. Former §12-63-407, concerning canteen — annual audit, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 732, § 5. The former section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 489, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1808.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of the Military and the United States Department of Defense” for “Arkansas Military Department and Department of Defense” in (d)(2)(B).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning canteen — state regulations, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 732, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 489, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1809.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 180; 1979, No. 422, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-804; Acts 2013, No. 1013, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 943, 944.

12-63-305. Conveyance or disposal of military real property.

(1)(A)If the Adjutant General of the State of Arkansas determines that any military reservation, armory, landing field, hangar, or any other estate in real property owned or possessed by the State of Arkansas for the use and benefit of the Arkansas National Guard or the armed forces of the United States is no longer useful or necessary for National Guard or other military purposes, the Adjutant General shall then have authority to sell, convey, or otherwise dispose of the property.

Every lease contract shall contain suitable provision for the immediate suspension or termination of the contract in the event of the occurrence of an emergency rendering the use of the property by the National Guard necessary for its military purposes and may provide for a refund out of the Special Military Fund to the lessee or sublessee of a rental paid in advance for the period covered by the lease during which the lessee or sublessee is by reason of the emergency deprived of the use of the property.

The moneys shall be credited to the Special Military Fund, to be used by the Adjutant General for the purposes of constructing, repairing, or maintaining hangars, armories, or other property held by the State of Arkansas for the use and benefit of its National Guard, subject to any priority interest of the United States in such proceeds.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 178, 182; 1977, No. 516, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-802, 11-806; Acts 2003, No. 1094, § 3.

Subchapter 4

— Camp Joseph T. Robinson

12-63-401. Title accepted.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 121, § 1; 1955, No. 381, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-1801, 11-1803; Acts 1993, No. 924, § 1; 1993, No. 1034, § 1.

12-63-402. Adjutant General as custodian.

The Adjutant General of the State of Arkansas is the custodian of all military property and military reservations located within the State of Arkansas, and which are owned, leased, licensed, operated, occupied, or maintained by the State of Arkansas for the purpose of training the active or reserve military forces of the United States or any of any state.

(1)The Adjutant General is not the custodian of any military property or military reservation which is reserved to the exclusive legislative jurisdiction and sovereignty of the United States or which is reserved to exclusive legislative authority of the United States Secretary of the Army, United States Secretary of the Navy, or United States Secretary of the Air Force, pursuant to the Constitution and laws of the United States.

Specifically, the Adjutant General is not the custodian of Little Rock Air Force Base and Pine Bluff Arsenal, except such parts thereof that are owned, leased, licensed, operated, occupied, or maintained pursuant to a deed, lease, license, or agreement for the exclusive control by the Adjutant General and units of the Army National Guard or Air National Guard, in accordance with the respective agreements between the Adjutant General and the United States Secretary of the Army or the United States Secretary of the Air Force.

(1)The Adjutant General shall not enter into or accept any contract, deed, license, lease, permit, memorandum of understanding, memorandum of agreement, obligation, gift, or donation of any real property whereby the State of Arkansas shall incur or undertake to incur financial liability for or assume financial liability with, or for, or on behalf of an agency or instrumentality of the United States, for such agency's or instrumentality's past or continuing violation or violations of:

The environmental protection laws of the State of Arkansas or of the United States;

The laws, regulations, rules, or orders of the Division of Environmental Quality or the United States Environmental Protection Agency; or

Any other law, regulation, rule, or order of any agency and instrumentality of the State of Arkansas or of the United States which is charged with the responsibility of enforcing the environmental law.

This prohibition shall not be applicable if:

The Adjutant General shall be authorized by federal law or regulation to accept such responsibility for remediation of past or continuing violations and the Adjutant General is provided, appropriated, allocated, or apportioned adequate funds from the United States required to remediate such violations;

The Attorney General, after conferring with the Director of theDivision of Environmental Quality, shall advise the Governor in writing that the potential financial liability of the state for environmental remediation is de minimus, and if the Governor shall so approve and concur in the Attorney General's advice; or

The laws of the United States prescribe and fix sole financial liability for such violation or violations upon an agency or instrumentality of the United States to the exclusion of the state.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 121, § 2; 1955, No. 381, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-1802, 11-1804; Acts 1997, No. 1201, § 5; 1999, No. 1164, § 120; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3027, 3028.

12-63-403. Lease or sale — Disposition of funds.

The Adjutant General shall have authority to lease or sublease property or portions thereto for such rentals, on such terms and conditions, and for such period of time as he or she shall deem to be in the best interest of the National Guard and the State of Arkansas.

The lease or sublease or contracts for sale of property which is not needed for military purposes shall be executed by the Adjutant General for and in the name and behalf of the State of Arkansas.

The contracts or leases shall contain suitable provisions for the immediate termination in the event of the occurrence of an emergency rendering the use of the property for military purposes.

Funds received or derived from leases, rentals, and sales of real property or from severed personal property derived from Camp Joseph T. Robinson shall be used for operations, maintenance, improvements, and personnel costs of Camp Joseph T. Robinson.

Funds received or derived from leases, rentals, and sales of real property or from severed personal property derived from Fort Chaffee shall be used for operations, maintenance, improvements, and personnel costs of Fort Chaffee.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 121, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1802; Acts 1997, No. 1201, § 6.

12-63-404. Canteen — Establishment and operations.

The Adjutant General, as custodian of military properties and military reservations, is authorized to institute and operate military-type canteens and exchanges similar to those operated by armed forces of the United States on any military reservation, and he or she shall have authority to designate suitable buildings and lands located on a military reservation for such purposes.

(1)Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, every military-type canteen established or operated pursuant to the authority granted under this section shall be subject to similar procedures, policies, limitations, and restrictions governing such canteens and exchanges of the Army and Air Force Exchange Service, as the Adjutant General may deem advisable, necessary, or expedient.

(A)Military canteens and exchanges established or operated pursuant to the authority granted under this section shall not sell, trade, exchange, market, or vend automobiles, household appliances, furniture, building products, motorcycles, and bicycles.

Military canteens and exchanges may contract with one (1) or more automobile rental agencies to provide leased or rented vehicles for use by uniformed service members, trainees, and other temporary residents of military reservations.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 489, § 1; 1983, No. 137, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1805; Acts 1997, No. 1201, § 7.

12-63-405. Canteens and exchanges — Adjutant General's powers and duties.

The Adjutant General shall have the authority:

Employees of canteens and exchanges are not subject to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 489, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1806; Acts 1997, No. 1201, § 8; 2019, No. 315, § 945.

12-63-406. Canteen — Inventory and sales — Tax exemption.

The Adjutant General, acting for and on behalf of the Arkansas National Guard, shall have authority to purchase normally regarded canteen inventory items, subject to the limitations prescribed in §12-63-404.

The sale of items shall be made only to:

Active and retired members of the Army National Guard and Air National Guard;

Active, retired, and reserve members of the United States Armed Forces;

United States Department of Defense employees;

Full-time employees of the Department of the Military;

The items sold shall be exempt from the imposition of any taxes levied by the State of Arkansas or by any political subdivision thereof.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 489, § 3; 1979, No. 362, § 1; 1983, No. 137, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1807; Acts 1987, No. 781, § 1; 1995, No. 521, § 1; 1997, No. 1201, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 5537.

12-63-407. Canteens — Camp Robinson and Fort Chaffee.

The General Assembly finds that the Adjutant General is subject to conflicting laws of the State of Arkansas and regulations of the United States Department of the Army and the National Guard Bureau, requiring the Adjutant General to reconcile conflicting laws and regulations.

The purpose of this section is to eliminate duplicated and conflicting laws, reconcile state law to United States Department of the Army, United States Department of the Air Force, and National Guard Bureau regulations, and to reduce operating expenses of the Camp Joseph T. Robinson and Fort Chaffee canteens.

The Adjutant General is authorized to operate the Camp Joseph T. Robinson and Fort Chaffee canteens in accordance with the regulations of the United States Department of the Army, United States Department of the Air Force, and the National Guard Bureau governing morale, welfare, and recreation fund activities as he or she may determine to be applicable.

(1)Nothing in this section shall be construed to eliminate the restrictions on the types of goods or services the Camp Joseph T. Robinson and Fort Chaffee canteens may offer for sale, trade, exchange, market, or vend.

This section shall not be construed to expand or broaden the authority of the Camp Joseph T. Robinson and Fort Chaffee canteens to sell goods and services to any person other than to:

The audit shall be conducted by a certified public accountant.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 732, §§ 1-4, 6, 7; 1997, No. 1201, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 5538.

12-63-408. [Repealed.]

All nonappropriated funds derived from the operation of the Camp Joseph T. Robinson and Fort Chaffee canteens shall be used exclusively for improvements on, to, or for Camp Joseph T. Robinson, Fort Chaffee, or any other military reservation, armory, airfield, or for the general welfare of the units and members of the Arkansas National Guard.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 489, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1810; Acts 1997, No. 1201, § 11.